Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1571
Discovery of property of debtor; examination; oath; referee.

The party or witness may be required to attend before the judge or before a referee appointed by the court or judge. If before a referee, the examination must be taken by the referee and certified by the judge. All examinations and answers before a judge or referee under sections 25-1564 to 25-1580 must be on oath, but when a corporation answers, the answer must be on the oath of an officer thereof.

R.S.1867, Code § 540, p. 488;

R.S.1913, § 8119;

C.S.1922, § 9055;

C.S.1929, § 20-1573;

R.S.1943, § 25-1571.

It is the duty of the district court, in a proceeding in aid of execution, when it is disclosed by the administrator of an estate that a judgment debtor has an interest in a distributive share of such estate, to impress a lien upon such share. Emerson-Brantingham Implement Co. v. Hallgren, 146 Neb. 530, 20 N.W.2d 501 (1945).

Judgment debtor may be a witness. Orchard & Wilhelm Co. v. North, 125 Neb. 723, 251 N.W. 895 (1933).